src/fst/clitics.lexc
!! Clitics in Võro
! ---------------

LEXICON K
 ENDLEX ;
+Clt:%>kin%{aä%}q ENDLEX ;
+Clt+Err/Orth-no-q:%>kin%{aä%} ENDLEX ;
+Clt:%>kiq ENDLEX ;
+Clt+Err/Orth-no-q:%>ki ENDLEX ;
+Clt:%>giq ENDLEX ;!CHECKME
+Clt+Err/Orth-no-q:%>gi ENDLEX ;!CHECKME
+Err/Orth+Clt:%^ErrorBack%>kinaq ENDLEX ;
+Err/Orth+Clt+Err/Orth-no-q:%^ErrorBack%>kina ENDLEX ;

LEXICON BACK_K
 ENDLEX ;
+Clt:%>kinaq ENDLEX ;
+Clt+Err/Orth-no-q:%>kina ENDLEX ;
+Clt:%>kiq ENDLEX ;
+Clt+Err/Orth-no-q:%>ki ENDLEX ;

LEXICON FRONT_K
 ENDLEX ;
+Clt:%>kinäq ENDLEX ;
+Clt+Err/Orth-no-q:%>kinä ENDLEX ;
+Err/Orth+Clt:%>kinaq ENDLEX ; ! THIS WILL NEED WORK 2016-08-27
+Err/Orth+Clt+Err/Orth-no-q:%>kina ENDLEX ; ! THIS WILL NEED WORK 2016-08-27
+Clt:%>kiq ENDLEX ;
+Clt+Err/Orth-no-q:%>ki ENDLEX ;

! Final lexicon
! =============


LEXICON ENDLEX
                        #       ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
